Vermont statutes. Title 23 Motor Vehicles
Subchapter 16. Liability of Operators

§ 1491.
Repealed.
1969, No. 194 (Adj. Sess.), § 1, eff. March 12, 1970.

§ 1492.
Liability for damage defined; limitations.

The owner, driver, operator, or mover of any motor truck, tractor, trailer, wagon, cart, carriage, or other object or contrivance which is moved or operated on any highway in violation of any of the provisions of sections 1098, 1145, 1302, 1305, and 1431 of this title, such portion of section 1141 of this title as pertains to trucks and buses, and such portion of section 1391 of this title as relates to weight in relation to tire surface, shall be liable to the State or municipal corporation in which the act is committed for damages to a public highway occasioned by such moving or operating, to be recovered in a civil action, in the name of the State or municipal corporation, or in an action on the bond provided in this chapter in connection with the issuance of permits, provided the action is brought within two years after such act is committed.